Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1212
Attorney's certificate; revocation or suspension; grounds; order; appeal.

In addition to the penalties prescribed in section 44-1209 and when not otherwise provided, the penalty for failure or refusal to comply with any of the terms and provisions of sections 44-1201 to 44-1214, upon the part of the attorney, shall be the refusal, suspension, or revocation of certificate of authority or license by the Department of Insurance and publication of his or her act, after due notice and opportunity for hearing has been given such attorney so that he or she may appear and show cause why such action should not be taken. An appeal may be taken from the decision of the Director of Insurance, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 11, p. 462;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 11, p. 685;

C.S.1922, § 7979;

C.S.1929, § 44-1511;

R.S.1943, § 44-1212;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 29, p. 1280;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 57.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.